Maryland, session 2025, HB0438.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
11–110.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Compensatory damages” means:
(i) In the case of the death of a pet, the fair market value of the pet
before death and the reasonable and necessary cost of veterinary care; and
(ii) In the case of an injury to a pet, the reasonable and necessary
cost of veterinary care.
(3) (i) “Pet” means a domesticated animal.
(ii) “Pet” does not include livestock.
(b) (1) A person who tortiously causes an injury to or death of a pet while
acting individually or through an animal under the person’s ownership, direction, or control
is liable to the owner of the pet for compensatory damages.
(2) The damages awarded under paragraph (1) of this subsection may not
exceed [$10,000] $25,000.
– 1 –

Ch. 101 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, April 22, 2025.
– 2 –